New Jersey, session 221, A658.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    As used in this act: Benzodiazepine means any substance or drug, including alprazolam, clonazepam, diazepam, lorazepam, and temazepam, which: contains a benzene ring fused to a seven member diazepine ring; results in the depression of the central nervous system; and is primarily intended to treat insomnia, convulsions, anxiety, muscle relaxation, and for pre-operation treatment. Long-term care facility means a nursing home, assisted living residence, comprehensive personal care home, residential health care facility, or dementia care home licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.). Non-benzodiazepine hypnotic means any substance or drug which produces effects similar to benzodiazepine and is primarily intended to treat insomnia, including zaleplon, zopiclone, and zolpidem. Pharmacist" means an individual currently licensed by this State to engage in the practice of pharmacy who does not dispense medication to patients in long-term care facilities. "Practitioner" means an individual currently licensed, registered, or otherwise authorized by this State to prescribe drugs in the course of professional practice who does not treat patients in long-term care facilities. 2.    The Department of Health shall: (a) establish protocols for practitioners to follow including a slow, patient controlled tapering and encouraging the use of the Ashton manual to safely discontinue patients use of benzodiazepines and non-benzodiazepines hypnotics to minimize patients symptoms of withdrawal, and permitting patients with long-term use of benzodiazepines, who are dependent on the medication, to remain on the medication or to safely taper at a rate that is determined by the patients symptoms; (b) produce and distribute in written or electronic form to pharmacies and practitioners to distribute to patients, a cautionary pamphlet for consumers regarding benzodiazepines and non-benzodiazepine hypnotics on: (1) misuse and abuse by adults and children; (2) risk of dependency and addiction; (3) proper storage and disposal; and (4) addiction support and treatment resources; (c) prohibit a practitioner or pharmacist from prescribing or dispensing a benzodiazepine or a non-benzodiazepine hypnotic unless pharmacist and practitioner has furnished the patient the pamphlet provided for in paragraph (b) of this section, and has collected the patients signed consent form, as determined by the Department of Health; (d) require bold lettering labels on benzodiazepine or non-benzodiazepine hypnotic prescriptions to alert patients to the risk of dependence, addiction, or both; and (e) prohibit one benzodiazepine or one non-benzodiazepine hypnotic prescription to exceed four weeks unless there is a proven medical need, medical exception, or both. 3.    The Department of Health shall adopt, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules or regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect 180 days after the date of enactment.